Arkansas statutes. Title 8 Environmental Law
Chapter 4 Arkansas Water and Air Pollution Control Act
The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Environmental Quality” for “Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality” in (a); substituted “division” for “department” throughout the section; substituted
“Arkansas Department of Environmental Quality or the Division of Environmental Quality” for “department” in the introductory language of (b)(2); and made similar changes throughout the section.

Cross References.

Permit fees for air, water, and solid waste pollution control activities, § 8-1-101 et seq.